Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.192

Application of RCW 36.34.150 through 36.34.190 to certain service provider agreements under chapter 70A.140 RCW.

RCW 36.34.150 through 36.34.190 shall not apply to agreements entered into pursuant to chapter 70A.140 RCW provided there is compliance with the procurement procedure under RCW 70A.140.040.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1021; 1986 c 244 s 12.]